Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202539-2807
Sections; termination.

Sections 39-2803 to 39-2805 and 39-2807 terminate on June 30, 2033. The State Treasurer shall transfer any unobligated funds remaining in the Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund on such date to the Cash Reserve Fund.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 131.
June 30, 2033